District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.15

Sexual Assault Victim Rights Task Force.

(a)

Beginning October 1, 2014, the OVS shall establish a Sexual Assault Victim Rights Task Force to study nationally recognized best practices and develop recommendations regarding:

(1)

The development and implementation of an effective mechanism for submitting, tracking, and investigating complaints regarding the handling of, or response to, a sexual assault report or investigation by any agency or organization involved in the response;

(2)

Whether a need exists for additional sexual assault victim advocates. If a need is identified, the Task Force shall:

(A)

Develop criteria to certify sexual assault victim advocates;

(B)

Create a plan for how the District, in conjunction with nonprofits, can provide additional sexual assault victim advocates to meet the needs identified; and

(C)

Determine the cost of funding such a plan;

(3)

Whether a need exists to expand the right to a sexual assault victim advocate beyond the hospital and law enforcement interview settings, such as meetings and conversations with prosecutors. If a need is identified, the Task Force shall:

(A)

Identify where the need exists and to what extent; and

(B)

Make recommendations on how best to fill that need, whether legislatively or otherwise;

(4)

Whether a need exists to expand the right to a sexual assault victim advocate to juvenile sexual assault victims. If a need is identified, the Task Force shall:

(A)

Identify where the need exists and to what extent; and

(B)

Make recommendations on how best to fill that need, whether legislatively or otherwise.

(b)

The Task Force shall be comprised of representatives from the following entities:

(1)

DC Sexual Assault Coalition;

(2)

DC SANE program;

(3)

DC Victim Assistance Network;

(4)

SART; and

(5)

A District of Columbia-based college or university; provided, that the representative at that institution provides direct victim services to sexual assault victims;

(6)

At least one governmental or agency-based victim services program;

(7)

At least 2 organizations for which the primary purpose of the organization is to provide services, education, or outreach to underserved populations disparately impacted by sexual assault; and

(8)

Other entities as determined by the OVS.

(c)

(1)

By September 30, 2015, the Task Force shall produce a report that includes the results of the assessments, developments, and recommendations completed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to be transmitted to the Council and the SART.

(2)

The Task Force shall disband after the report has been transmitted to the Council and the SART.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 215, 61 DCR 5913
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Sexual Assault Victim Rights Task Force Report Extension Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-50, Jan. 9, 2016, 62 DCR 13988).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Sexual Assault Victim Rights Task Force Report Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-159, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13720).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Sexual Assault Victim Rights Task Force Report Extension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-222, Dec. 17, 2015, 62 DCR 16239).